Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 269, O.S.L.
2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1688.1), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1688.1. A. 1. Effective January 1, 2026, no
contractor or journeyman license shall be renewed unless the
licensee has completed twelve (12) hours of continuing education
every three (3) years or thirty-six (36) months preceding the
expiration date of the license or registration certificate license
renewal. If a license expires before the licensee completes the
continuing education requirement, any continuing education that is
completed while the license is expired will be applied to the
continuing education requirement for the thirty-six (36) months
preceding the date the license expired. Once the continuing
education requirement for the expired license is met, along with any
other requirements, the expired license may be renewed. Twelve (12)
hours of continuing education will have to be completed in order to
meet the continuing education requirement for the subsequent thirty-
six-month period. The continuing education course and instructor

shall be approved in advance by the Committee of Electrical
Examiners. Exceptions to advance approval, or post-course approval,
may be allowed by the Committee, or its designee, for substitute
instructors in emergency situations when written notice of the
emergency is provided to the Committee, or its designee, within
seven (7) days of the course. The location of continuing education
courses shall be at the discretion of the course provider and may be
scheduled during the workday at the discretion of the course
provider. The continuing education material shall cover six (6)
hours of codes and revisions adopted by the Oklahoma Uniform
Building Code Commission (OUBCC). The remaining six (6) hours may
include the study of: electrical circuit theory and calculations,
wiring methods, grounding and bonding, transformer and motor theory,
electrical circuits and devices, control systems, alternative energy
systems including energy storage, safety related to the electrical
industry as defined by NFPA 70E, manufacturers' installation of
equipment or parts, the Electrical License Act, the trade
regulations as set forth in this act as well as the rules of the
Construction Industries Board, and other trade subject matters
approved by the Committee.
2. Effective January 1, 2026, no apprentice shall be permitted
to reregister unless the apprentice registrant has completed three
(3) hours of continuing education every year preceding the
expiration date of the registration certificate re-registration. If
a registration expires before the registrant completes the
continuing education requirement, any continuing education that is
completed while the registration is expired will be applied to the
continuing education requirement for the year preceding the date the
registration expired. Once the continuing education requirement for
the expired registration is met, along with any other requirements,
the apprentice is allowed to re-register after having an expired
registration. Three (3) hours of continuing education will still
have to be completed in order to meet the continuing education
requirement for the subsequent registration year. The continuing
education course and instructor shall be approved in advance by the
Committee. Exceptions to advance approval, or post-course approval,
may be allowed by the Committee, or its designee, for substitute
instructors in emergency situations when written notice of the
emergency is provided to the Committee, or its designee, within
seven (7) days of the course. The location of continuing education
courses shall be at the discretion of the course provider and may be
scheduled during the workday at the discretion of the course
provider. The continuing education material shall cover a
combination of the codes and revisions adopted by the OUBCC,
ENR. H. B. NO. 2084 Page 2

Oklahoma electrical industry regulations as well as the rules of the
Construction Industries Board, and "electrical safety" as defined by
NFPA 70E, other trade subject matters approved by the Committee, or
approved continuing education for the contractor or journeyman.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, if an apprentice
is a student apprentice or is enrolled and attending an approved
course, the continuing education shall not be required.
B. The Construction Industries Board shall amend its rules,
wherever applicable, to conform to the provisions of the Electrical
License Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2084 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2084 Page 4